Maine, session 132, LD129.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §4, as amended by PL 1975, c. 771, §26, is repealed and the
following enacted in its place:
§4. Dedimus justices
1. Appointment; term. The Governor may appoint in each county persons who are
designated as dedimus justices, before whom the oath required by the Constitution of Maine
to qualify civil officers may be taken and subscribed. A person appointed under this
subsection shall exercise that person's powers and duties and is commissioned to act within
Page 1 - 132LR0560(03)

and for each county for a term of 7 years. A person already designated as a dedimus justice
prior to October 1, 2025 is exempt from the 7-year term.
2. Change of information of dedimus justice. Within 30 calendar days of the
occurrence of any of the following changes to a dedimus justice's status or information
previously submitted, a dedimus justice shall submit written notice to the Governor and the
Secretary of State:
A. A change of the dedimus justice's name by court order or marriage;
B. A change of the dedimus justice's residence or mailing address; or
C. A change of the dedimus justice's e-mail address or telephone number.
3. Resignation. A dedimus justice may resign the dedimus justice's commission at
any time by submitting written notice to the Governor and the Secretary of State of the
intent to resign. The resignation is effective as of the date of the written notice. Upon
resignation, a dedimus justice shall return the dedimus justice's certificate of commission
to the Secretary of State.
Sec. 2. Mailing from Secretary of State. The Secretary of State shall send a
mailing to each person designated prior to October 1, 2025 as a dedimus justice pursuant
to the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 5, section 4 to request in return the person's updated
contact information, including the person's residence or mailing address, e-mail address
and telephone number. The mailing must also include information about the changes to
Title 5, section 4 provided in this Act and make clear that a dedimus justice designated
prior to October 1, 2025 is exempt from the term length requirement. Additionally, the
mailing must explain how the changes provide the opportunity for a dedimus justice to
resign the dedimus justice's commission.
Emergency clause. In view of the emergency cited in the preamble, this legislation
takes effect when approved.
Page 2 - 132LR0560(03)